apertium-ga-gv.ga.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZÁÉÍÓÚabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzáéíóú</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbcop"/>
    <sdef n="vpart"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/> <!-- Interjection -->

    <sdef n="aff"/>
    <sdef n="neg"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>

    <sdef n="dep"/> <!-- Dependent -->

    <sdef n="rel"/>

    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="emph"/>

    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>

    <sdef n="comp"/> <!-- Comparative -->

    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>

    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="voc"/>
    <sdef n="dat"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="com"/>

    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>

    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>

    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="aut"/>

    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pres"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>

    <sdef n="mon"/>
    <sdef n="iter"/>
    <sdef n="pers"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="apos"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>,</l>
          <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r>'<s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ordinals">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?ú</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="currency">
      <e>
        <re>[£$€][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mon"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!·]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Mutations -->

    <pardef n="initial-b">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>b</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>bh</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>mb</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>b</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-B">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>B</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Bh</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>BH</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>mB</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>B</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-c">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>c</l>
          <r>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>gc</l>
          <r>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>c</l>
          <r>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-C">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>C</l>
          <r>C</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Ch</l>
          <r>C</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>CH</l>
          <r>C</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>gC</l>
          <r>C</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>C</l>
          <r>C</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-d">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>dh</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>nd</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>d</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-D">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>D</l>
          <r>D</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Dh</l>
          <r>D</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>DH</l>
          <r>D</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>nD</l>
          <r>D</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>D</l>
          <r>D</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
          <r>f</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fh</l>
          <r>f</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>bhf</l>
          <r>f</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>f</l>
          <r>f</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-F">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>F</l>
          <r>F</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Fh</l>
          <r>F</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>FH</l>
          <r>F</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>bhF</l>
          <r>F</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>F</l>
          <r>F</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-g">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>gh</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ng</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>g</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-G">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>G</l>
          <r>G</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Gh</l>
          <r>G</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>GH</l>
          <r>G</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>nG</l>
          <r>G</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>G</l>
          <r>G</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>mh</l>
          <r>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>m</l>
          <r>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="doicheall"><par n="initial-d"/><i>oich</i><par n="f/eall__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Boihéim"><par n="initial-B"/><i>oihéim</i><par n="úir__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="fostaíocht"><par n="initial-f"/><i>ostaíocht</i><par n="eang__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Gabhar"><par n="initial-G"/><i>abha</i><par n="ú/r__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="claon"><par n="initial-c"/><i>laon</i><par n="mol__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bíosún"><par n="initial-b"/><i>íosú</i><par n="ia/n__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="móraigeanta"><par n="initial-m"/><i>óraigeanta</i><par n="tí__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Comórtas"><par n="initial-C"/><i>omórta</i><par n="ga/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gnéasoideachas"><par n="initial-g"/><i>néasoideacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Feidhmeannas"><par n="initial-F"/><i>eidhmeanna</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Doiminice"><par n="initial-D"/><i>oiminice</i><par n="lé__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Bantúch"><par n="initial-B"/><i>antú</i><par n="só/ch__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fochéimí"><par n="initial-f"/><i>ochéim</i><par n="n/í__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dearóile"><par n="initial-d"/><i>earóile</i><par n="lé__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="barróg"><par n="initial-b"/><i>arró</i><par n="pó/g__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ciapánta"><par n="initial-c"/><i>iapánta</i><par n="tí__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="maothán"><par n="initial-m"/><i>aothá</i><par n="ia/n__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Graonlainnis"><par n="initial-G"/><i>raonlainnis</i><par n="úir__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Cistéirseach"><par n="initial-C"/><i>istéirs</i><par n="ib/each__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gaiseite"><par n="initial-g"/><i>aiseit</i><par n="cim/e__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="díomas"><par n="initial-d"/><i>íoma</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="clog"><par n="initial-c"/><i>lo</i><par n="lo/g__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Fairisíneach"><par n="initial-F"/><i>airisín</i><par n="ib/each__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fichidí"><par n="initial-f"/><i>ichidí</i><par n="beola__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bráid"><par n="initial-b"/><i>rá</i><par n="brá/id__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Contae"><par n="initial-C"/><i>ontae</i><par n="Lú__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="muga"><par n="initial-m"/><i>uga</i><par n="ara__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Bodach"><par n="initial-B"/><i>oda</i><par n="uga/ch__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Donncha"><par n="initial-D"/><i>onncha</i><par n="Lú__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Glóir"><par n="initial-G"/><i>lóir</i><par n="cis__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="débhríoch"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ébhrí</i><par n="buí/och__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gafann"><par n="initial-g"/><i>afa</i><par n="adha/nn__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="clinic"><par n="initial-c"/><i>linic</i><par n="ara__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Fine"><par n="initial-F"/><i>ine</i><par n="lé__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="fiarán"><par n="initial-f"/><i>iará</i><par n="ia/n__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="béascna"><par n="initial-b"/><i>éascna</i><par n="ola__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Casacstáin"><par n="initial-C"/><i>asacstáin</i><par n="úir__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="meacan"><par n="initial-m"/><i>eaca</i><par n="ia/n__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Déiseach"><par n="initial-D"/><i>éis</i><par n="ib/each__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Filistíneach"><par n="initial-F"/><i>ilistín</i><par n="Áis/each__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Barbair"><par n="initial-B"/><i>arbair</i><par n="úir__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Guam"><par n="initial-G"/><i>uam</i><par n="Lú__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Dúitseach"><par n="initial-D"/><i>úits</i><par n="ib/each__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="goineadóir"><par n="initial-g"/><i>oineadó</i><par n="iteo/ir__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Darwineachas"><par n="initial-D"/><i>arwineacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dodhéantacht"><par n="initial-d"/><i>odhéantacht</i><par n="ócht__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="coinneálaí"><par n="initial-c"/><i>oinneála</i><par n="n/í__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Gaillimh"><par n="initial-G"/><i>aillimh</i><par n="úir__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Fionlainn"><par n="initial-F"/><i>ionlainn</i><par n="úir__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Beithil"><par n="initial-B"/><i>eithil</i><par n="úir__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Connacht"><par n="initial-C"/><i>onnacht</i><par n="dol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bású"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ás</i><par n="ur/ú__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fainge"><par n="initial-f"/><i>aing</i><par n="cim/e__n_m"/></e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/>
    </e>
